Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE I. ENFORCEMENT OF TRAFFIC LAWS

CHAPTER 702. CONTRACTS FOR ENFORCEMENT OF CERTAIN ARREST WARRANTS

Sec. 702.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Department" means the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) "Registration" of a motor vehicle includes a renewal of the registration of that vehicle.

(3) "Traffic law" means a statute or ordinance, a violation of which is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $200, that regulates, on a street, road, or highway of this state:

(A) the conduct or condition of a person while operating a motor vehicle; or

(B) the condition of a motor vehicle being operated.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.160(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 2S.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 702.003. REFUSAL TO REGISTER VEHICLE. (a) A county assessor-collector or the department may refuse to register a motor vehicle if the assessor-collector or the department receives under a contract information from a municipality that the owner of the vehicle has an outstanding warrant from that municipality for failure to appear or failure to pay a fine on a complaint that involves the violation of a traffic law.

(b) A municipality may contract with a county in which the municipality is located or the department to provide information to the county assessor-collector or department necessary to make a determination under Subsection (a).

(c) A municipality that has a contract under Subsection (b) shall notify the county assessor-collector or the department regarding a person for whom the county assessor-collector or the department has refused to register a motor vehicle on:

(1) entry of a judgment against the person and the person's payment to the court of the fine for the violation and of all court costs;

(2) perfection of an appeal of the case for which the arrest warrant was issued; or

(3) dismissal of the charge for which the arrest warrant was issued.

(d) After notice is received under Subsection (c), the county assessor-collector or the department may not refuse to register the motor vehicle under Subsection (a).

(e) A contract under Subsection (b) must be entered into in accordance with Chapter 791, Government Code, and is subject to the ability of the parties to provide or pay for the services required under the contract.

(e-1) A municipality that has a contract under Subsection (b) may impose an additional $20 reimbursement fee to a person who has an outstanding warrant from the municipality for failure to appear or failure to pay a fine on a complaint that involves the violation of a traffic law. The additional reimbursement fee may be used only to reimburse the department or the county assessor-collector for its expenses for providing services under the contract, or another county department for expenses related to services under the contract.

(f) This section does not apply to the registration of a motor vehicle under Section 501.0234.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.160(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 542 (S.B. 1617), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1094 (S.B. 1386), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.77, eff. January 1, 2020.

Sec. 702.004. WARNING; CITATION. (a) A peace officer authorized to issue citations in a municipality that has a contract under Section 702.003 shall issue a written warning to each person to whom the officer issues a citation for a violation of a traffic law in the municipality.

(b) The warning must state that if the person fails to appear in court as provided by law for the prosecution of the offense or fails to pay a fine for the violation, the person might not be permitted to register a motor vehicle in this state.

(c) The warning required by this section may be printed on the citation.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Transportation Code Sec. 702.005 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.160, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.